Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-624
Dangerous dogs;
local laws or ordinances.

Nothing in sections 54-617
to 54-623.01 shall be construed to restrict or prohibit any governing board
of any county, city, or village from establishing and enforcing laws or ordinances
at least as stringent as the provisions of sections 54-617 to 54-623.01.

Laws 1989, LB 208, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 21;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 14.